Hawaii statutes.
§128E-8 Funds for operation. (a) The
department shall establish an account, to be called the local emergency
response planning committees account, within the environmental response
revolving fund pursuant to section 128D-2, for the purpose of administration
and oversight of this chapter.

(b) All moneys to meet the general operating
needs and expenses of the emergency planning and community right-to-know
program of the department shall be allocated by the legislature through
appropriations out of the state general fund and the environmental response
revolving fund; provided that the appropriations from the environmental
response revolving fund shall not exceed the amount of moneys collected from
the filing fees assessed in section 128E-9. The department shall include in
its budgetary request for each upcoming fiscal period the amounts necessary to
effectuate the purposes of this chapter.

(c) The department of health, with the
assistance of the department of budget and finance and department of accounting
and general services, shall prepare a report for the legislature concerning the
amount of moneys collected during the preceding fiscal year, the amount of
moneys collected to date during the current fiscal year, and the amount of
moneys to be collected during the upcoming fiscal year, pursuant to sections
128E-9 and 128E-11. The department shall submit the foregoing report to the
legislature not less than twenty days prior to the convening of each regular
session of the legislature. [L 1993, c 300, pt of §1; am L 1997, c 260, §4]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next